Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-23,105
Reports required.

Upon request of a governmental unit, a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall report as of the date of such request the amount of public money or public funds deposited in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution that is not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (1) by the governmental unit making the request and (2) by all other governmental units and secured pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398, and the total value of the deposit guaranty bond or the aggregate market value of the pool of securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted to secure public money or public funds held by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution, including those deposited by the governmental unit. Upon request of a governmental unit, a qualified trustee shall report as of the date of such request the total value of the deposit guaranty bond or the aggregate market value of the pool of securities deposited, pledged, or in which a security interest has been granted by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution and shall provide an itemized list of the securities in the pool. Such reports shall be made on or before the date the governmental unit specifies.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 50;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 99;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 35;

Laws 2021, LB66, § 10.